Hawaii statutes.
§171-66 Planning. In addition to the
requirements set forth in sections 171-33 and 171-34, prior to making these
dispositions, the board of land and natural resources shall:

(1) Determine the economic feasibility and need for
proposed disposition;

(2) Determine the minimum economic unit required for
the successful undertaking of the specific use intended, taking into
consideration soil fertility, soil condition, and availability of water; and

(3) Subdivide the land into economic units and make
such improvements as are necessary in conformity with applicable county or city
and county zoning and subdivision requirements, including the construction of
necessary roads and irrigation facilities. [L 1962, c 32, pt of §2; Supp,
§103A-62; HRS §171-66]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next